Nevada, session 83, AB366.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 319.600 is hereby amended to read as follows:
319.600 1. The Division shall [, subject to the availability of
funds appropriated for such a purpose,] develop and implement a
supportive housing grant program for the purpose of awarding
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
grants for the development of supportive housing and the provision
of supportive housing services. The program must include a process
for applying for a grant to:
(a) Procure and develop supportive housing;
(b) Train and build the capacity of a supportive housing
partnership;
(c) Fund the operation of a supportive housing partnership; and
(d) Analyze the progress of supportive housing in this State.
2. Any recipient of a grant for supportive housing must agree
in writing to comply with all applicable provisions of chapter 118A
of NRS.
3. The Division shall consult with the Nevada Interagency
Advisory Council on Homelessness to Housing created by NRS
232.4981 before approving any application for a grant pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 1.
4. The Division shall adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section. The regulations must prescribe, without
limitation:
(a) The criteria for eligibility to receive money from the
supportive housing grant program; and
(b) Procedures for the submission and review of applications to
receive money from the supportive housing grant program.
5. On or before December 1 of each year that the supportive
housing grant program is funded, the Division shall submit a report
to the Chair of the Nevada Interagency Advisory Council on
Homelessness to Housing, the Governor and the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Legislature, or to
the Legislative Commission, if the Legislature is not in session. The
report must include:
(a) Information on and feedback from grant recipients; and
(b) Information on the use of grant money and participation in
the supportive housing grant program.
6. The Division may use a portion of the money in the Nevada
Supportive Housing Development [Fund] Account created by NRS
319.610 to prepare the report required by subsection 5.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Supportive housing” means subsidized housing that reduces
barriers to retaining housing that are caused by a person’s rental
history, criminal history and income through the provision of onsite
and offsite supportive services that are designed to assist a person
who has:
(1) A disabling behavioral or physical health condition; and
(2) Experienced:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(I) Homelessness or been at imminent risk of
homelessness; or
(II) Unnecessary institutionalization.
(b) “Supportive services” includes, without limitation, social
services, community support services, case management services,
employment services, health care and behavioral health treatment.
Sec. 2. NRS 319.610 is hereby amended to read as follows:
319.610 1. [There is hereby created as a special revenue fund
in the State Treasury the] The Nevada Supportive Housing
Development [Fund.] Account is hereby created in the State
General Fund.
2. The Division may accept gifts, bequests, grants,
appropriations and donations from any sources for deposit in the
[Fund.] Account.
3. The money in the [Fund] Account must be invested as other
state [funds] accounts are invested. All interest earned on the
deposit or investment of money in the [Fund,] Account, after
deducting any applicable charges, must be credited to the [Fund.]
Account. Claims against the [Fund] Account must be paid as other
claims against the State are paid.
4. The money in the [Fund] Account must be used to carry out
the provisions of NRS 319.600.
5. Any money remaining in the Account at the end of a fiscal
year does not revert to the State General Fund, and the balance in
the Account must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
Sec. 3. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Nevada Supportive Housing Development Account
created by NRS 319.610, as amended by section 2 of this act, the
sum of $21,000,000 to carry out the supportive housing grant
program developed pursuant to NRS 319.600, as amended by
section 1 of this act.
Sec. 3.5. Beginning with the executive budget for the 2027-
2029 biennium, if the Governor does not include in the proposed
executive budget a budgetary request for any amount of money for
the Nevada Supportive Housing Development Account created by
NRS 319.610, as amended by section 2 of this act, to carry out the
supportive housing grant program developed pursuant to NRS
319.600, as amended by section 1 of this act, the Governor shall
submit, with the proposed executive budget transmitted pursuant to
NRS 353.230, a statement outlining the reasons that the Governor
has not included a budgetary request for that purpose to the Director
of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Legislature.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
Sec. 4. 1. The State Controller shall, if necessary to carry out
the provisions of this act, cause the transfer of any money between
funds and accounts whose designations are changed by the
provisions of this act.
2. All rights and liabilities of a fund whose designation is
changed by the provisions of this act are not affected by the change
in designation and remain the rights and liabilities of the fund or
account as newly designated.
Sec. 5. 1. The Legislative Counsel shall, in preparing
supplements to the Nevada Administrative Code, appropriately
change any references to a fund or account whose designation has
been changed pursuant to the provisions of this act.
2. Any reference in a bill or resolution passed by the 83rd
Session of the Nevada Legislature to a fund or account whose
designation is changed pursuant to the provisions of this act shall be
deemed to refer to the fund or account by its changed designation.
Sec. 6. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)